Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-6142
Rules and regulations.

The director may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations and issue orders to carry out the Mutual Insurance Holding Company Act.

Laws 1997, LB 740, § 21.